District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-1624

Examination papers and other evidence of qualification to be filed with Board; record

Repealed.

History

Mar. 13, 1993, D.C. Law 9-184, § 604, 39 DCR 8208

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-201 to 2-231.